Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision
§ 47-7-83.
Supervision of offenders from participating states.

Pursuant to the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, the Department of Corrections may assume the duties of supervision over offenders of any sending state who were convicted of misdemeanors. The Department of Corrections may not supervise offenders convicted of misdemeanors of states that are not participating in the compact.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 457, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 47-7-85.
Application fee for out-of-state transfer; funds received to defray compact expenses.

Pursuant to the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, the Department of Corrections may charge a one-time application fee in the amount of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) to each offender applying for out-of-state transfer under the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision. Payments received under this section shall be deposited into a special fund which is created in the State Treasury. Monies in the fund shall be expended by the Department of Corrections, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to defray costs incurred by the department under the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision. Unexpended amounts remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 457, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 359, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2006.).